Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB804.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "dealer" or "motor vehicle dealer" and "new motor vehicle" in section 2 of the act of March 28, 1984 (P.L.150, No.28), known as the Automobile Lemon Law, amended November 18, 2024 (P.L.1205, No.151), are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions A DEFINITION to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Dealer" or "motor vehicle dealer." A person in the business <--<--123456789101112131415161718 of buying, selling, leasing or exchanging motor vehicles or recreational vehicles.* * *"House coach." A motor vehicle with an enclosed area that is designed, constructed or equipped for use, either permanently or temporarily, as a mobile dwelling place, sleeping place or camping accommodation. A house coach includes:(1) a motor home;(2) a slide-in cabin;(3) a sleeping unit specifically designed for mounting on a pickup truck; and(4) a sleeping cabin designed for use on trucks and truck tractors operated for heavy-duty, long-distance hauling."House trailer." Any of the following:(1) A trailer that is designed, constructed and equipped for use, either permanently or temporarily, as a mobile dwelling place or sleeping place and is equipped for use as a conveyance on streets and highways.(2) A trailer containing a chassis and exterior shell designed and constructed for use as a house trailer, as defined in paragraph (1), but which is used permanently or temporarily for advertising, sales, display or promotion of merchandise or services or for any other commercial purpose except the transportation of property.* * *"Motor home." A motor vehicle designed or adapted for use as a mobile dwelling place or office, except a motor vehicle equipped with a truck camper."New motor vehicle." Any new and unused self-propelled, motorized conveyance driven upon public roads, streets or 20250HB0804PN1625 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 highways which is designed to transport not more than 15 persons, which was purchased or leased and is registered in the Commonwealth or purchased or leased elsewhere and registered for the first time in the Commonwealth and is used, leased or bought for use primarily for personal, family or household purposes, including a vehicle used by a manufacturer or dealer as a demonstrator or dealer car prior to its sale. The term includes [motorcycles and does not include motor homes, off-road vehicles or dual sport motorcycles] a motorcycle or recreational vehicle. The term does not include an off-road vehicle or dual sport motorcycle driven off road.* * *"Recreational trailer." A trailer designed or adapted to provide temporary living quarters for noncommercial recreational, camping or travel use."Recreational vehicle." Any new and unused self-propelled motorized conveyance or vehicle to be towed by a motor vehicle that is purchased or leased for the first time in this Commonwealth and that is registered in this Commonwealth if required by the department. This term includes, but is not limited to:(1) a house coach;(2) a house trailer;(3) a motor home;(4) a recreational trailer; or(5) a truck camper."Truck camper." A structure designed, used or maintained primarily to be loaded or affixed to a motor vehicle to provide a mobile dwelling, sleeping place, office or commercial space."RECREATIONAL VEHICLE." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 102 OF THE ACT 20250HB0804PN1625 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF DECEMBER 22, 1983 (P.L.306, NO.84), KNOWN AS THE BOARD OF VEHICLES ACT.SECTION 2. SECTION 4(A) OF THE ACT, AMENDED NOVEMBER 18, 2024 (P.L.1205, NO.151), IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 4. REPAIR OBLIGATIONS.(A) REPAIRS REQUIRED.--THE MANUFACTURER OF A NEW MOTOR VEHICLE SOLD OR LEASED AND REGISTERED IN THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL REPAIR OR CORRECT, AT NO COST TO THE PURCHASER, A NONCONFORMITY WHICH SUBSTANTIALLY IMPAIRS THE USE, VALUE OR SAFETY OF SAID MOTOR VEHICLE WHICH:(1) IN THE CASE OF A MOTORCYCLE, MAY OCCUR WITHIN A PERIOD OF ONE YEAR FOLLOWING THE ACTUAL DELIVERY OF THE MOTORCYCLE TO THE PURCHASER OR DURING THE TERM OF THE WARRANTY, WHICHEVER MAY OCCUR FIRST; [OR](2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3), IN THE CASE OF ANY OTHER NEW MOTOR VEHICLE, MAY OCCUR WITHIN A PERIOD OF ONE YEAR FOLLOWING THE ACTUAL DELIVERY OF THE VEHICLE TO THE PURCHASER, WITHIN THE FIRST 12,000 MILES OF USE OR DURING THE TERM OF THE WARRANTY, WHICHEVER MAY FIRST OCCUR[.]; OR(3) MAY OCCUR WITHIN A PERIOD OF ONE YEAR FOLLOWING THE ACTUAL DELIVERY OF THE RECREATIONAL VEHICLE TO THE PURCHASER OR DURING THE TERM OF THE WARRANTY FOR A RECREATIONAL VEHICLE THAT DOES NOT HAVE AN ODOMETER, WHICHEVER MAY OCCUR FIRST.* * *Section 2 3. This act shall apply to recreational vehicles sold or leased on or after January 1, 2026 2027, in this Commonwealth.Section 3 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0804PN1625 - 4 - <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728